Ohio, session 136, HB934.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 3301.0714, 3302.03, 3314.03, 3317.25, 3324.10, and 3326.11 be amended and new section 3313.6032 and sections 3302.131, 3302.132, 3313.6034, 3313.6035, 3319.2214, and 3319.2311 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3301.0714. (A) The department of education and workforce shall adopt rules for a statewide education management information system. The rules shall require the department to establish guidelines for the establishment and maintenance of the system in accordance with this section and the rules adopted under this section. The guidelines shall include: (1) Standards identifying and defining the types of data in the system in accordance with divisions (B) and (C) of this section; (2) Procedures for annually collecting and reporting the data to the department in accordance with division (D) of this section; (3) Procedures for annually compiling the data in accordance with division (G) of this section; (4) Procedures for annually reporting the data to the public in accordance with division (H) of this section; (5) Standards to provide strict safeguards to protect the confidentiality of personally identifiable student data. (B) The guidelines adopted under this section shall require the data maintained in the education management information system to include at least the following: (1) Student participation and performance data, for each grade in each school district as a whole and for each grade in each school building in each school district, that includes: (a) The numbers of students receiving each category of instructional service offered by the school district, such as regular education instruction, vocational education instruction, specialized instruction programs or enrichment instruction that is part of the educational curriculum, instruction for gifted students, instruction for students with disabilities, and remedial instruction. The guidelines shall require instructional services under this division to be divided into discrete categories if an instructional service is limited to a specific subject, a specific type of student, or both, such as regular instructional services in mathematics, remedial reading instructional services, instructional services specifically for students gifted in mathematics or some other subject area, or instructional services for students with a specific type of disability. The categories of instructional services required by the guidelines under this division shall be the same as the categories of instructional services used in determining cost units pursuant to division (C)(3) of this section. (b) The numbers of students receiving support or extracurricular services for each of the support services or extracurricular programs offered by the school district, such as counseling services, health services, and extracurricular sports and fine arts programs. The categories of services required by the guidelines under this division shall be the same as the categories of services used in determining cost units pursuant to division (C)(4)(a) of this section. (c) Average student grades in each subject in grades nine through twelve; (d) Academic achievement levels as assessed under sections 3301.0710, 3301.0711, and 3301.0712 of the Revised Code; (e) The number of students designated as having a disabling condition pursuant to division (C)(1) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code; (f) The numbers of students reported to the department pursuant to division (C)(2) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code; (g) Attendance rates and the average daily attendance for the year. For purposes of this division, a student shall be counted as present for any field trip that is approved by the school administration. (h) Expulsion rates; (i) Suspension rates; (j) Dropout rates; (k) Rates of retention in grade; (l) For pupils in grades nine through twelve, the average number of carnegie units, as calculated in accordance with the director's rules; (m) Graduation rates, to be calculated in a manner specified by the department that reflects the rate at which students who were in the ninth grade three years prior to the current year complete school and that is consistent with nationally accepted reporting requirements; (n) Results of diagnostic assessments described in division (A)(1) of section 3301.0715 of the Revised Code; (o) The number of students earning each state diploma seal included in the system prescribed under division (A) of section 3313.6114 of the Revised Code; (p) The number of students demonstrating competency for graduation using each option described in divisions (B)(1)(a) to (d) of section 3313.618 of the Revised Code; (q) The number of students completing each foundational and supporting option as part of the demonstration of competency for graduation pursuant to division (B)(1)(b) of section 3313.618 of the Revised Code; (r) The number of students enrolled in all-day kindergarten, as defined in section 3321.05 of the Revised Code. (2) Personnel and classroom enrollment data for each school district, including: (a) The total numbers of licensed employees and nonlicensed employees and the numbers of full-time equivalent licensed employees and nonlicensed employees providing each category of instructional service, instructional support service, and administrative support service used pursuant to division (C)(3) of this section. The guidelines adopted under this section shall require these categories of data to be maintained for the school district as a whole and, wherever applicable, for each grade in the school district as a whole, for each school building as a whole, and for each grade in each school building. (b) The total number of employees and the number of full-time equivalent employees providing each category of service used pursuant to divisions (C)(4)(a) and (b) of this section, and the total numbers of licensed employees and nonlicensed employees and the numbers of full-time equivalent licensed employees and nonlicensed employees providing each category used pursuant to division (C)(4)(c) of this section. The guidelines adopted under this section shall require these categories of data to be maintained for the school district as a whole and, wherever applicable, for each grade in the school district as a whole, for each school building as a whole, and for each grade in each school building. (c) The total number of regular classroom teachers teaching classes of regular education and the average number of pupils enrolled in each such class, in each of grades kindergarten through five in the district as a whole and in each school building in the school district. (d) The number of lead teachers employed by each school district and each school building. (3)(a) Student demographic data for each school district, including information regarding the gender ratio of the school district's pupils, the racial make-up of the school district's pupils, the number of English learners in the district, and an appropriate measure of the number of the school district's pupils who reside in economically disadvantaged households. The demographic data shall be collected in a manner to allow correlation with data collected under division (B)(1) of this section. Categories for data collected pursuant to division (B)(3) of this section shall conform, where appropriate, to standard practices of agencies of the federal government. (b) With respect to each student entering kindergarten, whether the student previously participated in a public preschool program, a private preschool program, or a head start program, and the number of years the student participated in each of these programs. (4)(a) The core curriculum and instructional materials being used for English language arts in each of grades pre-kindergarten to five; (b) The reading intervention programs being used in each of grades pre-kindergarten to twelve. (5)(5)(a) The core curriculum and instructional materials being used for mathematics in each of grades kindergarten to twelve; (b) The mathematics intervention programs being used in each of grades kindergarten to twelve. (6) Any data required to be collected pursuant to federal law. (C) The education management information system shall include cost accounting data for each district as a whole and for each school building in each school district. The guidelines adopted under this section shall require the cost data for each school district to be maintained in a system of mutually exclusive cost units and shall require all of the costs of each school district to be divided among the cost units. The guidelines shall require the system of mutually exclusive cost units to include at least the following: (1) Administrative costs for the school district as a whole. The guidelines shall require the cost units under this division (C)(1) to be designed so that each of them may be compiled and reported in terms of average expenditure per pupil in enrolled ADM in the school district, as determined pursuant to section 3317.03 of the Revised Code. (2) Administrative costs for each school building in the school district. The guidelines shall require the cost units under this division (C)(2) to be designed so that each of them may be compiled and reported in terms of average expenditure per full-time equivalent pupil receiving instructional or support services in each building. (3) Instructional services costs for each category of instructional service provided directly to students and required by guidelines adopted pursuant to division (B)(1)(a) of this section. The guidelines shall require the cost units under division (C)(3) of this section to be designed so that each of them may be compiled and reported in terms of average expenditure per pupil receiving the service in the school district as a whole and average expenditure per pupil receiving the service in each building in the school district and in terms of a total cost for each category of service and, as a breakdown of the total cost, a cost for each of the following components: (a) The cost of each instructional services category required by guidelines adopted under division (B)(1)(a) of this section that is provided directly to students by a classroom teacher; (b) The cost of the instructional support services, such as services provided by a speech-language pathologist, classroom aide, multimedia aide, or librarian, provided directly to students in conjunction with each instructional services category; (c) The cost of the administrative support services related to each instructional services category, such as the cost of personnel that develop the curriculum for the instructional services category and the cost of personnel supervising or coordinating the delivery of the instructional services category. (4) Support or extracurricular services costs for each category of service directly provided to students and required by guidelines adopted pursuant to division (B)(1)(b) of this section. The guidelines shall require the cost units under division (C)(4) of this section to be designed so that each of them may be compiled and reported in terms of average expenditure per pupil receiving the service in the school district as a whole and average expenditure per pupil receiving the service in each building in the school district and in terms of a total cost for each category of service and, as a breakdown of the total cost, a cost for each of the following components: (a) The cost of each support or extracurricular services category required by guidelines adopted under division (B)(1)(b) of this section that is provided directly to students by a licensed employee, such as services provided by a guidance counselor or any services provided by a licensed employee under a supplemental contract; (b) The cost of each such services category provided directly to students by a nonlicensed employee, such as janitorial services, cafeteria services, or services of a sports trainer; (c) The cost of the administrative services related to each services category in division (C)(4)(a) or (b) of this section, such as the cost of any licensed or nonlicensed employees that develop, supervise, coordinate, or otherwise are involved in administering or aiding the delivery of each services category. (D)(1) The guidelines adopted under this section shall require school districts to collect information about individual students, staff members, or both in connection with any data required by division (B) or (C) of this section or other reporting requirements established in the Revised Code. The guidelines may also require school districts to report information about individual staff members in connection with any data required by division (B) or (C) of this section or other reporting requirements established in the Revised Code. The guidelines shall not authorize school districts to request social security numbers of individual students. The guidelines shall prohibit the reporting under this section of a student's name, address, and social security number to the department. The guidelines shall also prohibit the reporting under this section of any personally identifiable information about any student, except for the purpose of assigning the data verification code required by division (D)(2) of this section, to any other person unless such person is employed by the school district or the information technology center operated under section 3301.075 of the Revised Code and is authorized by the district or technology center to have access to such information or is employed by an entity with which the department contracts for the scoring or the development of state assessments. The guidelines may require school districts to provide the social security numbers of individual staff members and the county of residence for a student. Nothing in this section prohibits the department from providing a student's county of residence to the department of taxation to facilitate the distribution of tax revenue. (2)(a) The guidelines shall provide for each school district or community school to assign a data verification code that is unique on a statewide basis over time to each student whose initial Ohio enrollment is in that district or school and to report all required individual student data for that student utilizing such code. The guidelines shall also provide for assigning data verification codes to all students enrolled in districts or community schools on the effective date of the guidelines established under this section. The assignment of data verification codes for other entities, as described in division (D)(2)(d) of this section, the use of those codes, and the reporting and use of associated individual student data shall be coordinated by the department of education and workforce in accordance with state and federal law. School districts shall report individual student data to the department through the information technology centers utilizing the code. The entities described in division (D)(2)(d) of this section shall report individual student data to the department in the manner prescribed by the department. (b)(i) Except as provided in sections 3301.941, 3310.11, 3310.42, 3310.63, 3313.978, 3317.20, and 5747.057 of the Revised Code, and in division (D)(2)(b)(ii) of this section, at no time shall the department have access to information that would enable any data verification code to be matched to personally identifiable student data. (ii) For the purpose of making per-pupil payments to community schools under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code, the department shall have access to information that would enable any data verification code to be matched to personally identifiable student data. (c) Each school district and community school shall ensure that the data verification code is included in the student's records reported to any subsequent school district, community school, or state institution of higher education, as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, in which the student enrolls. Any such subsequent district or school shall utilize the same identifier in its reporting of data under this section. (d)(i) The director of any state agency that administers a publicly funded program providing services to children who are younger than compulsory school age, as defined in section 3321.01 of the Revised Code, including the directors of health, job and family services, mental health and addiction services, children and youth, and developmental disabilities, shall request and receive, pursuant to sections 3301.0723 and 5180.33 of the Revised Code, a data verification code for a child who is receiving those services. (ii) The director of developmental disabilities, director of health, director of job and family services, director of children and youth, director of mental health and addiction services, medicaid director, executive director of the commission on minority health, executive director of the opportunities for Ohioans with disabilities agency, or director of education and workforce, on behalf of a program that receives public funds and provides services to children who are younger than compulsory school age, may request and receive, pursuant to section 3301.0723 of the Revised Code, a data verification code for a child who is receiving services from the program. (E) The guidelines adopted under this section may require school districts to collect and report data, information, or reports other than that described in divisions (A), (B), and (C) of this section for the purpose of complying with other reporting requirements established in the Revised Code. The other data, information, or reports may be maintained in the education management information system but are not required to be compiled as part of the profile formats required under division (G) of this section or the annual statewide report required under division (H) of this section. (F) The board of education of each school district shall annually collect and report to the department, in accordance with the guidelines established by the department, the data required pursuant to this section. A school district may collect and report these data notwithstanding section 2151.357 or 3319.321 of the Revised Code. (G) The department shall, in accordance with the procedures it adopts, annually compile the data reported by each school district pursuant to division (D) of this section. The department shall design formats for profiling each school district as a whole and each school building within each district and shall compile the data in accordance with these formats. These profile formats shall: (1) Include all of the data gathered under this section in a manner that facilitates comparison among school districts and among school buildings within each school district; (2) Present the data on academic achievement levels as assessed by the testing of student achievement maintained pursuant to division (B)(1)(d) of this section. (H)(1) The department shall, in accordance with the procedures it adopts, annually prepare a statewide report for all school districts and the general public that includes the profile of each of the school districts developed pursuant to division (G) of this section. Copies of the report shall be sent to each school district. (2) The department shall, in accordance with the procedures it adopts, annually prepare an individual report for each school district and the general public that includes the profiles of each of the school buildings in that school district developed pursuant to division (G) of this section. (I) Any data that is collected or maintained pursuant to this section and that identifies an individual pupil is not a public record for the purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (J) As used in this section: (1) "School district" means any city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district and, in accordance with section 3314.17 of the Revised Code, any community school. As used in division (L) of this section, "school district" also includes any educational service center or other educational entity required to submit data using the system established under this section. (2) "Cost" means any expenditure for operating expenses made by a school district excluding any expenditures for debt retirement except for payments made to any commercial lending institution for any loan approved pursuant to section 3313.483 of the Revised Code. (K) Any person who removes data from the information system established under this section for the purpose of releasing it to any person not entitled under law to have access to such information is subject to section 2913.42 of the Revised Code prohibiting tampering with data. (L)(1) In accordance with division (L)(2) of this section and the rules adopted under division (L)(10) of this section, the department may sanction any school district that reports incomplete or inaccurate data, reports data that does not conform to data requirements and descriptions published by the department, fails to report data in a timely manner, or otherwise does not make a good faith effort to report data as required by this section. (2) If the department decides to sanction a school district under this division, the department shall take the following sequential actions: (a) Notify the district in writing that the department has determined that data has not been reported as required under this section and require the district to review its data submission and submit corrected data by a deadline established by the department. The department also may require the district to develop a corrective action plan, which shall include provisions for the district to provide mandatory staff training on data reporting procedures. (b) Withhold up to ten per cent of the total amount of state funds due to the district for the current fiscal year and, if not previously required under division (L)(2)(a) of this section, require the district to develop a corrective action plan in accordance with that division; (c) Withhold an additional amount of up to twenty per cent of the total amount of state funds due to the district for the current fiscal year; (d) Direct department staff or an outside entity to investigate the district's data reporting practices and make recommendations for subsequent actions. The recommendations may include one or more of the following actions: (i) Arrange for an audit of the district's data reporting practices by department staff or an outside entity; (ii) Conduct a site visit and evaluation of the district; (iii) Withhold an additional amount of up to thirty per cent of the total amount of state funds due to the district for the current fiscal year; (iv) Continue monitoring the district's data reporting; (v) Assign department staff to supervise the district's data management system; (vi) Conduct an investigation to determine whether to suspend or revoke the license of any district employee in accordance with division (N) of this section; (vii) If the district is issued a report card under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, indicate on the report card that the district has been sanctioned for failing to report data as required by this section; (viii) If the district is issued a report card under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code and incomplete or inaccurate data submitted by the district likely caused the district to receive a higher performance rating than it deserved under that section, issue a revised report card for the district; (ix) Any other action designed to correct the district's data reporting problems. (3) Any time the department takes an action against a school district under division (L)(2) of this section, the department shall make a report of the circumstances that prompted the action. The department shall send a copy of the report to the district superintendent or chief administrator and maintain a copy of the report in its files. (4) If any action taken under division (L)(2) of this section resolves a school district's data reporting problems to the department's satisfaction, the department shall not take any further actions described by that division. If the department withheld funds from the district under that division, the department may release those funds to the district, except that if the department withheld funding under division (L)(2)(c) of this section, the department shall not release the funds withheld under division (L)(2)(b) of this section and, if the department withheld funding under division (L)(2)(d) of this section, the department shall not release the funds withheld under division (L)(2)(b) or (c) of this section. (5) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the department may use its own staff or an outside entity to conduct an audit of a school district's data reporting practices any time the department has reason to believe the district has not made a good faith effort to report data as required by this section. If any audit conducted by an outside entity under division (L)(2)(d)(i) or (5) of this section confirms that a district has not made a good faith effort to report data as required by this section, the district shall reimburse the department for the full cost of the audit. The department may withhold state funds due to the district for this purpose. (6) Prior to issuing a revised report card for a school district under division (L)(2)(d)(viii) of this section, the department may hold a hearing to provide the district with an opportunity to demonstrate that it made a good faith effort to report data as required by this section. The hearing shall be conducted by a referee appointed by the department. Based on the information provided in the hearing, the referee shall recommend whether the department should issue a revised report card for the district. If the referee affirms the department's contention that the district did not make a good faith effort to report data as required by this section, the district shall bear the full cost of conducting the hearing and of issuing any revised report card. (7) If the department determines that any inaccurate data reported under this section caused a school district to receive excess state funds in any fiscal year, the district shall reimburse the department an amount equal to the excess funds, in accordance with a payment schedule determined by the department. The department may withhold state funds due to the district for this purpose. (8) Any school district that has funds withheld under division (L)(2) of this section may appeal the withholding in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (9) In all cases of a disagreement between the department and a school district regarding the appropriateness of an action taken under division (L)(2) of this section, the burden of proof shall be on the district to demonstrate that it made a good faith effort to report data as required by this section. (10) The director of education and workforce shall adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement division (L) of this section. (M) No information technology center or school district shall acquire, change, or update its student administration software package to manage and report data required to be reported to the department unless it converts to a student software package that is certified by the department. (N) The state board of education, in accordance with sections 3319.31 and 3319.311 of the Revised Code, may suspend or revoke a license as defined under division (A) of section 3319.31 of the Revised Code that has been issued to any school district employee found to have willfully reported erroneous, inaccurate, or incomplete data to the education management information system. (O) No person shall release or maintain any information about any student in violation of this section. Whoever violates this division is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. (P) If the department cannot compile any of the information required by division (I) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code based upon the data collected under this section, the department shall develop a plan and a reasonable timeline for the collection of any data necessary to comply with that division. Sec. 3302.03. Not later than the thirty-first day of July of each year, the department of education and workforce shall submit preliminary report card data for overall academic performance and for each separate performance measure for each school district, and each school building, in accordance with this section. Annually, not later than the fifteenth day of September or the preceding Friday when that day falls on a Saturday or Sunday, the department shall assign a letter grade or performance rating for overall academic performance and for each separate performance measure for each school district, and each school building in a district, in accordance with this section. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement this section. The department's rules shall establish performance criteria for each letter grade or performance rating and prescribe a method by which the department assigns each letter grade or performance rating. For a school building to which any of the performance measures do not apply, due to grade levels served by the building, the department shall designate the performance measures that are applicable to the building and that must be calculated separately and used to calculate the building's overall grade or performance rating. The department shall issue annual report cards reflecting the performance of each school district, each building within each district, and for the state as a whole using the performance measures and letter grade or performance rating system described in this section. The department shall include on the report card for each district and each building within each district the most recent two-year trend data in student achievement for each subject and each grade. (A)(1) For the 2012-2013 school year, the department shall issue grades as described in division (F) of this section for each of the following performance measures: (a) Annual measurable objectives; (b) Performance index score for a school district or building. Grades shall be awarded as a percentage of the total possible points on the performance index system as adopted by the department. In adopting benchmarks for assigning letter grades under division (A)(1)(b) of this section, the department shall designate ninety per cent or higher for an "A," at least seventy per cent but not more than eighty per cent for a "C," and less than fifty per cent for an "F." (c) The extent to which the school district or building meets each of the applicable performance indicators established by the department under section 3302.02 of the Revised Code and the percentage of applicable performance indicators that have been achieved. In adopting benchmarks for assigning letter grades under division (A)(1)(c) of this section, the department shall designate ninety per cent or higher for an "A." (d) The four- and five-year adjusted cohort graduation rates. In adopting benchmarks for assigning letter grades under division (A)(1)(d), (B)(1)(d), or (C)(1)(d) of this section, the department shall designate a four-year adjusted cohort graduation rate of ninety-three per cent or higher for an "A" and a five-year cohort graduation rate of ninety-five per cent or higher for an "A." (e) The overall score under the value-added progress dimension of a school district or building, for which the department shall use up to three years of value-added data as available. The letter grade assigned for this growth measure shall be as follows: (i) A score that is at least one standard error of measure above the mean score shall be designated as an "A." (ii) A score that is less than one standard error of measure above but greater than one standard error of measure below the mean score shall be designated as a "B." (iii) A score that is less than or equal to one standard error of measure below the mean score but greater than two standard errors of measure below the mean score shall be designated as a "C." (iv) A score that is less than or equal to two standard errors of measure below the mean score but is greater than three standard errors of measure below the mean score shall be designated as a "D." (v) A score that is less than or equal to three standard errors of measure below the mean score shall be designated as an "F." Whenever the value-added progress dimension is used as a graded performance measure in this division and divisions (B) and (C) of this section, whether as an overall measure or as a measure of separate subgroups, the grades for the measure shall be calculated in the same manner as prescribed in division (A)(1)(e) of this section. (f) The value-added progress dimension score for a school district or building disaggregated for each of the following subgroups: students identified as gifted, students with disabilities, and students whose performance places them in the lowest quintile for achievement on a statewide basis. Each subgroup shall be a separate graded measure. (2) The department shall adopt a resolution describing the performance measures, benchmarks, and grading system for the 2012-2013 school year and shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that prescribe the methods by which the performance measures under division (A)(1) of this section shall be assessed and assigned a letter grade, including performance benchmarks for each letter grade. At least forty-five days prior to the department's adoption of rules to prescribe the methods by which the performance measures under division (A)(1) of this section shall be assessed and assigned a letter grade, the department shall conduct a public presentation before the standing committees of the house of representatives and the senate that consider education legislation describing such methods, including performance benchmarks. (3) There shall not be an overall letter grade for a school district or building for the 2012-2013 school year. (B)(1) For the 2013-2014 school year, the department shall issue grades as described in division (F) of this section for each of the following performance measures: (a) Annual measurable objectives; (b) Performance index score for a school district or building. Grades shall be awarded as a percentage of the total possible points on the performance index system as created by the department. In adopting benchmarks for assigning letter grades under division (B)(1)(b) of this section, the department shall designate ninety per cent or higher for an "A," at least seventy per cent but not more than eighty per cent for a "C," and less than fifty per cent for an "F." (c) The extent to which the school district or building meets each of the applicable performance indicators established by the department under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code and the percentage of applicable performance indicators that have been achieved. In adopting benchmarks for assigning letter grades under division (B)(1)(c) of this section, the department shall designate ninety per cent or higher for an "A." (d) The four- and five-year adjusted cohort graduation rates; (e) The overall score under the value-added progress dimension of a school district or building, for which the department shall use up to three years of value-added data as available. (f) The value-added progress dimension score for a school district or building disaggregated for each of the following subgroups: students identified as gifted in superior cognitive ability and specific academic ability fields under Chapter 3324. of the Revised Code, students with disabilities, and students whose performance places them in the lowest quintile for achievement on a statewide basis. Each subgroup shall be a separate graded measure. (g) Whether a school district or building is making progress in improving literacy in grades kindergarten through three, as determined using a method prescribed by the department. The department shall adopt rules to prescribe benchmarks and standards for assigning grades to districts and buildings for purposes of division (B)(1)(g) of this section. In adopting benchmarks for assigning letter grades under divisions (B)(1)(g) and (C)(1)(g) of this section, the department shall determine progress made based on the reduction in the total percentage of students scoring below grade level, or below proficient, compared from year to year on the reading diagnostic assessments administered under section 3301.0715 of the Revised Code and the third grade English language arts assessment under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code, as applicable. The department shall designate for a "C" grade a value that is not lower than the statewide average value for this measure. No grade shall be issued under divisions (B)(1)(g) and (C)(1)(g) of this section for a district or building in which less than five per cent of students have scored below grade level on the diagnostic assessment administered to students in kindergarten under division (B)(1) of section 3313.608 of the Revised Code. (h) For a high mobility school district or building, an additional value-added progress dimension score. For this measure, the department shall use value-added data from the most recent school year available and shall use assessment scores for only those students to whom the district or building has administered the assessments prescribed by section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code for each of the two most recent consecutive school years. As used in this division, "high mobility school district or building" means a school district or building where at least twenty-five per cent of its total enrollment is made up of students who have attended that school district or building for less than one year. (2) In addition to the graded measures in division (B)(1) of this section, the department shall include on a school district's or building's report card all of the following without an assigned letter grade: (a) The percentage of students enrolled in a district or building participating in advanced placement classes and the percentage of those students who received a score of three or better on advanced placement examinations; (b) The number of a district's or building's students who have earned at least three college credits through dual enrollment or advanced standing programs, such as the post-secondary enrollment options program under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code and state-approved career-technical courses offered through dual enrollment or statewide articulation, that appear on a student's transcript or other official document, either of which is issued by the institution of higher education from which the student earned the college credit. The credits earned that are reported under divisions (B)(2)(b) and (C)(2)(c) of this section shall not include any that are remedial or developmental and shall include those that count toward the curriculum requirements established for completion of a degree. (c) The percentage of students enrolled in a district or building who have taken a national standardized test used for college admission determinations and the percentage of those students who are determined to be remediation-free in accordance with standards adopted under division (F) of section 3345.061 of the Revised Code; (d) The percentage of the district's or the building's students who receive industry-recognized credentials as approved under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code. (e) The percentage of students enrolled in a district or building who are participating in an international baccalaureate program and the percentage of those students who receive a score of four or better on the international baccalaureate examinations. (f) The percentage of the district's or building's students who receive an honors diploma under division (B) of section 3313.61 of the Revised Code. (3) The department shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that prescribe the methods by which the performance measures under divisions (B)(1)(f) and (B)(1)(g) of this section will be assessed and assigned a letter grade, including performance benchmarks for each grade. At least forty-five days prior to the department's adoption of rules to prescribe the methods by which the performance measures under division (B)(1) of this section shall be assessed and assigned a letter grade, the department shall conduct a public presentation before the standing committees of the house of representatives and the senate that consider education legislation describing such methods, including performance benchmarks. (4) There shall not be an overall letter grade for a school district or building for the 2013-2014, 2014-2015, 2015-2016, and 2016-2017 school years. (C)(1) For the 2014-2015, 2015-2016, 2016-2017, 2017-2018, 2018-2019, 2019-2020, and 2020-2021 school years, the department shall issue grades as described in division (F) of this section for each of the performance measures prescribed in division (C)(1) of this section. The graded measures are as follows: (a) Annual measurable objectives. For the 2017-2018 school year, the department shall not include any subgroup data in the annual measurable objectives that includes data from fewer than twenty-five students. For the 2018-2019 school year, the department shall not include any subgroup data in the annual measurable objectives that includes data from fewer than twenty students. Beginning with the 2019-2020 school year, the department shall not include any subgroup data in the annual measurable objectives that includes data from fewer than fifteen students. (b) Performance index score for a school district or building. Grades shall be awarded as a percentage of the total possible points on the performance index system as created by the department. In adopting benchmarks for assigning letter grades under division (C)(1)(b) of this section, the department shall designate ninety per cent or higher for an "A," at least seventy per cent but not more than eighty per cent for a "C," and less than fifty per cent for an "F." (c) The extent to which the school district or building meets each of the applicable performance indicators established by the department under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code and the percentage of applicable performance indicators that have been achieved. In adopting benchmarks for assigning letter grades under division (C)(1)(c) of this section, the department shall designate ninety per cent or higher for an "A." (d) The four- and five-year adjusted cohort graduation rates; (e) The overall score under the value-added progress dimension, or another measure of student academic progress if adopted by the department, of a school district or building, for which the department shall use up to three years of value-added data as available. In adopting benchmarks for assigning letter grades for overall score on value-added progress dimension under division (C)(1)(e) of this section, the department shall prohibit the assigning of a grade of "A" for that measure unless the district's or building's grade assigned for value-added progress dimension for all subgroups under division (C)(1)(f) of this section is a "C" or higher. For the metric prescribed by division (C)(1)(e) of this section, the department may adopt a student academic progress measure to be used instead of the value-added progress dimension. If the department adopts such a measure, it also shall prescribe a method for assigning letter grades for the new measure that is comparable to the method prescribed in division (A)(1)(e) of this section. (f) The value-added progress dimension score of a school district or building disaggregated for each of the following subgroups: students identified as gifted in superior cognitive ability and specific academic ability fields under Chapter 3324. of the Revised Code, students with disabilities, and students whose performance places them in the lowest quintile for achievement on a statewide basis, as determined by a method prescribed by the department. Each subgroup shall be a separate graded measure. The department may adopt student academic progress measures to be used instead of the value-added progress dimension. If the department adopts such measures, it also shall prescribe a method for assigning letter grades for the new measures that is comparable to the method prescribed in division (A)(1)(e) of this section. (g) Whether a school district or building is making progress in improving literacy in grades kindergarten through three, as determined using a method prescribed by the department. The department shall adopt rules to prescribe benchmarks and standards for assigning grades to a district or building for purposes of division (C)(1)(g) of this section. The department shall designate for a "C" grade a value that is not lower than the statewide average value for this measure. No grade shall be issued under division (C)(1)(g) of this section for a district or building in which less than five per cent of students have scored below grade level on the kindergarten diagnostic assessment under division (B)(1) of section 3313.608 of the Revised Code. (h) For a high mobility school district or building, an additional value-added progress dimension score. For this measure, the department shall use value-added data from the most recent school year available and shall use assessment scores for only those students to whom the district or building has administered the assessments prescribed by section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code for each of the two most recent consecutive school years. As used in this division, "high mobility school district or building" means a school district or building where at least twenty-five per cent of its total enrollment is made up of students who have attended that school district or building for less than one year. (2) In addition to the graded measures in division (C)(1) of this section, the department shall include on a school district's or building's report card all of the following without an assigned letter grade: (a) The percentage of students enrolled in a district or building who have taken a national standardized test used for college admission determinations and the percentage of those students who are determined to be remediation-free in accordance with the standards adopted under division (F) of section 3345.061 of the Revised Code; (b) The percentage of students enrolled in a district or building participating in advanced placement classes and the percentage of those students who received a score of three or better on advanced placement examinations; (c) The percentage of a district's or building's students who have earned at least three college credits through advanced standing programs, such as the college credit plus program under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code and state-approved career-technical courses offered through dual enrollment or statewide articulation, that appear on a student's college transcript issued by the institution of higher education from which the student earned the college credit. The credits earned that are reported under divisions (B)(2)(b) and (C)(2)(c) of this section shall not include any that are remedial or developmental and shall include those that count toward the curriculum requirements established for completion of a degree. (d) The percentage of the district's or building's students who receive an honor's diploma under division (B) of section 3313.61 of the Revised Code; (e) The percentage of the district's or building's students who receive industry-recognized credentials as approved under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code; (f) The percentage of students enrolled in a district or building who are participating in an international baccalaureate program and the percentage of those students who receive a score of four or better on the international baccalaureate examinations; (g) The results of the college and career-ready assessments administered under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code; (h) Whether the school district or building has implemented a positive behavior intervention and supports framework in compliance with the requirements of section 3319.46 of the Revised Code, notated as a "yes" or "no" answer. (3) The department shall adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that establish a method to assign an overall grade for a school district or school building for the 2017-2018 school year and each school year thereafter. The rules shall group the performance measures in divisions (C)(1) and (2) of this section into the following components: (a) Gap closing, which shall include the performance measure in division (C)(1)(a) of this section; (b) Achievement, which shall include the performance measures in divisions (C)(1)(b) and (c) of this section; (c) Progress, which shall include the performance measures in divisions (C)(1)(e) and (f) of this section; (d) Graduation, which shall include the performance measure in division (C)(1)(d) of this section; (e) Kindergarten through third-grade literacy, which shall include the performance measure in division (C)(1)(g) of this section; (f) Prepared for success, which shall include the performance measures in divisions (C)(2)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this section. The department shall develop a method to determine a grade for the component in division (C)(3)(f) of this section using the performance measures in divisions (C)(2)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this section. When available, the department may incorporate the performance measure under division (C)(2)(g) of this section into the component under division (C)(3)(f) of this section. When determining the overall grade for the prepared for success component prescribed by division (C)(3)(f) of this section, no individual student shall be counted in more than one performance measure. However, if a student qualifies for more than one performance measure in the component, the department may, in its method to determine a grade for the component, specify an additional weight for such a student that is not greater than or equal to 1.0. In determining the overall score under division (C)(3)(f) of this section, the department shall ensure that the pool of students included in the performance measures aggregated under that division are all of the students included in the four- and five-year adjusted graduation cohort. In the rules adopted under division (C)(3) of this section, the department shall adopt a method for determining a grade for each component in divisions (C)(3)(a) to (f) of this section. The department also shall establish a method to assign an overall grade of "A," "B," "C," "D," or "F" using the grades assigned for each component. The method the department adopts for assigning an overall grade shall give equal weight to the components in divisions (C)(3)(b) and (c) of this section. At least forty-five days prior to the department's adoption of rules to prescribe the methods for calculating the overall grade for the report card, as required by this division, the department shall conduct a public presentation before the standing committees of the house of representatives and the senate that consider education legislation describing the format for the report card, weights that will be assigned to the components of the overall grade, and the method for calculating the overall grade. (D) For the 2021-2022 school year and each school year thereafter, all of the following apply: (1) The department shall include on a school district's or building's report card all of the following performance measures without an assigned performance rating: (a) Whether the district or building meets the gifted performance indicator under division (A)(2) of section 3302.02 of the Revised Code and the extent to which the district or building meets gifted indicator performance benchmarks; (b) The extent to which the district or building meets the chronic absenteeism indicator under division (A)(3) of section 3302.02 of the Revised Code; (c) Performance index score percentage for a district or building, which shall be calculated by dividing the district's or building's performance index score according to the performance index system created by the department by the maximum performance index score for a district or building. The maximum performance index score shall be as follows: (i) For a building, the average of the highest two per cent of performance index scores achieved by a building for the school year for which a report card is issued; (ii) For a district, the average of the highest two per cent of performance index scores achieved by a district for the school year for which a report card is issued. (d) The overall score under the value-added progress dimension of a district or building, for which the department shall use three consecutive years of value-added data. In using three years of value-added data to calculate the measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(d) of this section, the department shall assign a weight of fifty per cent to the most recent year's data and a weight of twenty-five per cent to the data of each of the other years. However, if three consecutive years of value-added data is not available, the department shall use prior years of value-added data to calculate the measure, as follows: (i) If two consecutive years of value-added data is not available, the department shall use one year of value-added data to calculate the measure. (ii) If two consecutive years of value-added data is available, the department shall use two consecutive years of value-added data to calculate the measure. In using two years of value-added data to calculate the measure, the department shall assign a weight of sixty-seven per cent to the most recent year's data and a weight of thirty-three per cent to the data of the other year. (e) The four-year adjusted cohort graduation rate. (f) The five-year adjusted cohort graduation rate. (g) The percentage of students in the district or building who score proficient or higher on the reading segment of the third grade English language arts assessment under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. To the extent possible, the department shall include the results of the summer administration of the third grade reading assessment under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code in the performance measures prescribed under divisions (D)(1)(g) and (h) of this section. (h) Whether a district or building is making progress in improving literacy in grades kindergarten through three, as determined using a method prescribed by the department. The method shall determine progress made based on the reduction in the total percentage of students scoring below grade level, or below proficient, compared from year to year on the reading segments of the diagnostic assessments administered under division (A)(1) of section 3301.0715 of the Revised Code and the third grade English language arts assessment under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code, as applicable. The method shall not include a deduction for students who did not pass the third grade English language arts assessment under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code and were not on a reading improvement and monitoring plan. The performance measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(h) of this section shall not be included on the report card of a district or building in which less than ten per cent of students have scored below grade level on the diagnostic assessment administered to students in kindergarten under division (B)(1) of section 3313.608 of the Revised Code. (i) The percentage of students in a district or building who are promoted to the fourth grade based on the student's score on the third grade English language arts assessment under division (A)(3) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code or demonstrate competency on an alternative assessment under division (A)(2)(c) of section 3313.608 of the Revised Code; (j) A post-secondary readiness measure. This measure shall be calculated by dividing the number of students included in the four-year adjusted graduation rate cohort who demonstrate post-secondary readiness by the total number of students included in the denominator of the four-year adjusted graduation rate cohort. Demonstration of post-secondary readiness shall include a student doing any of the following: (i) Attaining a remediation-free score, in accordance with standards adopted under division (F) of section 3345.061 of the Revised Code, on a nationally standardized assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code; (ii) Attaining required scores on three or more advanced placement, college-level examination program, or international baccalaureate examinations. The required score for an advanced placement examination shall be a three or better. The required score for a college-level examination program examination shall be a passing score, as determined by the department. The required score for an international baccalaureate examination shall be a four or better. A student may satisfy this condition with any combination of advanced placement, college-level examination program, or international baccalaureate examinations. (iii) Earning at least twelve college credits through advanced standing programs, such as the college credit plus program under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code, an early college high school program under section 3313.6013 of the Revised Code, and state-approved career-technical courses offered through dual enrollment or statewide articulation, that appear on a student's college transcript issued by the institution of higher education from which the student earned the college credit. Earned credits reported under division (D)(1)(j)(iii) of this section shall include credits that count toward the curriculum requirements established for completion of a degree, but shall not include any remedial or developmental credits. (iv) Meeting the additional criteria for an honors diploma under division (B) of section 3313.61 of the Revised Code; (v) Earning an industry-recognized credential or license issued by a state agency or board for practice in a vocation that requires an examination for issuance of that license approved under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code; (vi) Satisfying any of the following conditions: (I) Completing a pre-apprenticeship aligned with options established under section 3313.904 of the Revised Code in the student's chosen career field; (II) Completing an apprenticeship registered with the apprenticeship council established under section 4139.02 of the Revised Code in the student's chosen career field; (III) Providing evidence of acceptance into an apprenticeship program after high school that is restricted to participants eighteen years of age or older. (vii) Earning a cumulative score of proficient or higher on three or more state technical assessments aligned with section 3313.903 of the Revised Code in a single career pathway; (viii) Earning an OhioMeansJobs-readiness seal established under section 3313.6112 of the Revised Code and completing two hundred fifty hours of an internship or other work-based learning experience that is either: (I) Approved by the business advisory council established under section 3313.82 of the Revised Code that represents the student's district; or (II) Aligned to the career-technical education pathway approved by the department in which the student is enrolled. (ix) Providing evidence that the student has enlisted in a branch of the armed services of the United States as defined in section 5910.01 of the Revised Code. A student who satisfies more than one of the conditions prescribed under this division shall be counted as one student for the purposes of calculating the measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(j) of this section. (2) In addition to the performance measures under division (D)(1) of this section, the department shall report on a district's or building's report card all of the following data without an assigned performance rating: (a) The applicable performance indicators established by the department under division (A)(1) of section 3302.02 of the Revised Code; (b) The overall score under the value-added progress dimension of a district or building for the most recent school year; (c) A composite of the overall scores under the value-added progress dimension of a district or building for the previous three school years or, if only two years of value-added data are available, for the previous two years; (d) The percentage of students included in the four- and five-year adjusted cohort graduation rates of a district or building who did not receive a high school diploma under section 3313.61 or 3325.08 of the Revised Code. To the extent possible, the department shall disaggregate that data according to the following categories: (i) Students who are still enrolled in the district or building and receiving general education services; (ii) Students with an individualized education program, as defined in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code, who satisfied the conditions for a high school diploma under section 3313.61 or 3325.08 of the Revised Code, but opted not to receive a diploma and are still receiving education services; (iii) Students with an individualized education program who have not yet satisfied conditions for a high school diploma under section 3313.61 or 3325.08 of the Revised Code and who are still receiving education services; (iv) Students who are no longer enrolled in any district or building; (v) Students who, upon enrollment in the district or building for the first time, had completed fewer units of high school instruction required under section 3313.603 of the Revised Code than other students in the four- or five-year adjusted cohort graduation rate. The department may disaggregate the data prescribed under division (D)(2)(d) of this section according to other categories that the department determines are appropriate. (e) Post-graduate outcomes for students who were enrolled in a district or building and received a high school diploma under section 3313.61 or 3325.08 of the Revised Code in the school year prior to the school year for which the report card is issued, including the percentage of students who: (i) Enrolled in a post-secondary educational institution. To the extent possible, the department shall disaggregate that data according to whether the student enrolled in a four-year institution of higher education, a two-year institution of higher education, an Ohio technical center that provides adult technical education services and is recognized by the chancellor of higher education, or another type of post-secondary educational institution. (ii) Entered an apprenticeship program registered with the apprenticeship council established under Chapter 4139. of the Revised Code. The department may include other job training programs with similar rigor and outcomes. (iii) Attained gainful employment, as determined by the department; (iv) Enlisted in a branch of the armed forces of the United States, as defined in section 5910.01 of the Revised Code. (f) Whether the school district or building has implemented a positive behavior intervention and supports framework in compliance with the requirements of section 3319.46 of the Revised Code, notated with a "yes" or "no"; (g) The number and percentage of high school seniors in each school year who completed the free application for federal student aid; (h) Beginning with the report card issued under this section for the 2022-2023 school year, a student opportunity profile measure that reports data regarding the opportunities provided to students by a district or building. To the extent possible, and when appropriate, the data shall be disaggregated by grade level and subgroup. The measure also shall include data regarding the statewide average, the average for similar school districts, and, for a building, the average for the district in which the building is located. The measure shall include all of the following data for the district or building: (i) The average ratio of teachers of record to students in each grade level in a district or building; (ii) The average ratio of school counselors to students in a district or building; (iii) The average ratio of nurses to students in a district or building; (iv) The average ratio of licensed librarians and library media specialists to students in a district or building; (v) The average ratio of social workers to students in a district or building; (vi) The average ratio of mental health professionals to students in a district or building; (vii) The average ratio of paraprofessionals to students in a district or building; (viii) The percentage of teachers with fewer than three years of experience teaching in any school; (ix) The percentage of principals with fewer than three years of experience as a principal in any school; (x) The percentage of teachers who are not teaching in the subject or field for which they are certified or licensed; (xi) The percentage of kindergarten students who are enrolled in all-day kindergarten, as defined in section 3321.05 of the Revised Code; (xii) The percentage of students enrolled in a performing or visual arts course; (xiii) The percentage of students enrolled in a physical education or wellness course; (xiv) The percentage of students enrolled in a world language course; (xv) The percentage of students in grades seven through twelve who are enrolled in a career-technical education course; (xvi) The percentage of students participating in one or more cocurricular activities; (xvii) The percentage of students participating in advance placement courses, international baccalaureate courses, honors courses, or courses offered through the college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code; (xviii) The percentage of students identified as gifted in superior cognitive ability and specific academic ability fields under Chapter 3324. of the Revised Code and receiving gifted services pursuant to that chapter; (xix) The percentage of students participating in enrichment or support programs offered by the district or building outside of the normal school day; (xx) The percentage of eligible students participating each school day in school breakfast programs offered by the district or building in accordance with section 3313.813 or 3313.818 of the Revised Code; (xxi) The percentage of students who are transported by a school bus each school day; (xxii) The ratio of portable technology devices that students may take home to the number of students. The department shall include only opportunity measures at the building level for which data for buildings is available, as determined by a school district. (i)(i) The percentage of students included in the four- and five-year adjusted cohort graduation rates of the district or building who completed all of grades nine through twelve while enrolled in the district or building; (ii) The four-year adjusted cohort graduation rate for only those students who were continuously enrolled in the same district or building for grades nine through twelve. (j) Whether the district or building provides information about and promotes the college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code to students in accordance with section 3365.04 of the Revised Code, notated with a "yes" or "no"; (k) The percentage of students in the district or building to whom both of the following apply: (i) The students are promoted to fourth grade and not subject to retention under division (A)(2) of section 3313.608 of the Revised Code. (ii) The students completed all of the grade levels offered prior to the fourth grade in the district or building. (l) The reading and math curricula used in each school building and whether the curriculum is designated as high-quality by the department under section 3313.6035 of the Revised Code. The department shall report the information required under this division in a form and manner determined by the department. (3) Except as provided in division (D)(3)(f) of this section, the department shall use the method prescribed under rules adopted under division (D)(4) of this section to assign performance ratings of "one star," "two stars," "three stars," "four stars," or "five stars," as described in division (F) of this section, for a district or building for the individual components prescribed under division (D)(3) of this section. The department also shall assign an overall performance rating for a district or building in accordance with division (D)(3)(g) of this section. The method shall use the performance measures prescribed under division (D)(1) of this section to calculate performance ratings for components. The method may report data under division (D)(2) of this section with corresponding components, but shall not use the data to calculate performance ratings for that component. The performance measures and reported data shall be grouped together into components as follows: (a) Gap closing. In addition to other criteria determined appropriate by the department, performance ratings for the gap closing component shall reflect whether each of the following performance measures are met or not met: (i) The gifted performance indicator as described in division (D)(1)(a) of this section; (ii) The chronic absenteeism indicator as described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (iii) For English learners, an English language proficiency improvement indicator established by the department; (iv) The subgroup graduation targets; (v) The subgroup achievement targets in both mathematics and English language arts; (vi) The subgroup progress targets in both mathematics and English language arts. Achievement and progress targets under division (D)(3)(a) of this section shall be calculated individually, and districts and buildings shall receive a status of met or not met on each measure. The department shall not require a subgroup of a district or building to meet both the achievement and progress targets at the same time to receive a status of met. The department shall not include any subgroup data in this measure that includes data from fewer than fifteen students. Any penalty for failing to meet the required assessment participation rate must be partially in proportion to how close the district or building was to meeting the rate requirement. (b) Achievement, which shall include the performance measure in division (D)(1)(c) of this section and the reported data in division (D)(2)(a) of this section. Performance ratings for the achievement component shall be awarded as a percentage of the maximum performance index score described in division (D)(1)(c) of this section. (c) Progress, which shall include the performance measure in division (D)(1)(d) of this section and the reported data in divisions (D)(2)(b) and (c) of this section; (d) Graduation, which shall include the performance measures in divisions (D)(1)(e) and (f) of this section and the reported data in divisions (D)(2)(d) and (j) of this section. The four-year adjusted cohort graduation rate shall be assigned a weight of sixty per cent and the five-year adjusted cohort graduation rate shall be assigned a weight of forty per cent. (e) Early literacy, which shall include the performance measures in divisions (D)(1)(g), (h), and (i) of this section and the reported data in division (D)(2)(k) of this section. If the measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(h) of this section is included in a report card, performance ratings for the early literacy component shall give a weight of forty per cent to the measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(g) of this section, a weight of thirty-five per cent to the measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(i) of this section, and a weight of twenty-five per cent to the measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(h) of this section. If the measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(h) of this section is not included in a report card of a district or building, performance ratings for the early literacy component shall give a weight of sixty per cent to the measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(g) of this section and a weight of forty per cent to the measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(i) of this section. (f) College, career, workforce, and military readiness, which shall include the performance measure in division (D)(1)(j) of this section and the reported data in division (D)(2)(e) of this section. For the 2021-2022, 2022-2023, and 2023-2024 school years, the department only shall report the data for, and not assign a performance rating to, the college, career, workforce, and military readiness component. The reported data shall include the percentage of students who demonstrate post-secondary readiness using any of the options described in division (D)(1)(j) of this section. The department shall analyze the data included in the performance measure prescribed in division (D)(1)(j) of this section for the 2021-2022, 2022-2023, and 2023-2024 school years. Using that data, the department shall develop and propose rules for a method to assign a performance rating to the college, career, workforce, and military readiness component based on that measure. The method to assign a performance rating shall not include a tiered structure or per student bonuses. The rules shall specify that a district or building shall not receive lower than a performance rating of three stars for the component if the district's or building's performance on the component meets or exceeds a level of improvement set by the department. Notwithstanding division (D)(4)(b) of this section, more than half of the total districts and buildings may earn a performance rating of three stars on this component to account for the districts and buildings that earned a performance rating of three stars because they met or exceeded the level of improvement set by the department. The department shall submit the rules to the joint committee on agency rule review. The committee shall conduct at least one public hearing on the proposed rules and approve or disapprove the rules. If the committee approves the rules, the department shall adopt the rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. If the rules are adopted, the department shall assign a performance rating to the college, career, workforce, and military readiness component under the rules beginning with the 2024-2025 school year, and for each school year thereafter. If the committee disapproves the rules, the component shall be included in the report card only as reported data for the 2024-2025 school year, and each school year thereafter. (g)(i) Except as provided for in division (D)(3)(g)(ii) of this section, beginning with the 2022-2023 school year, under the method prescribed under rules adopted in division (D)(4) of this section, the department shall use the performance ratings assigned for the components prescribed in divisions (D)(3)(a) to (e) of this section to determine and assign an overall performance rating of "one star," "one and one-half stars," "two stars," "two and one-half stars," "three stars," "three and one-half stars," "four stars," "four and one-half stars," or "five stars" for a district or building. The method shall give equal weight to the components in divisions (D)(3)(b) and (c) of this section. The method shall give equal weight to the components in divisions (D)(3)(a), (d), and (e) of this section. The individual weights of each of the components prescribed in divisions (D)(3)(a), (d), and (e) of this section shall be equal to one-half of the weight given to the component prescribed in division (D)(3)(b) of this section. (ii) If the joint committee on agency rule review approves the department's rules regarding the college, career, workforce, and military readiness component as described in division (D)(3)(f) of this section, for the 2024-2025 school year, and each school year thereafter, the department's method shall use the components in divisions (D)(3)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this section to calculate the overall performance rating. The method shall give equal weight to the components in divisions (D)(3)(b) and (c) of this section. The method shall give equal weight to the components prescribed in divisions (D)(3)(a), (d), (e), and (f) of this section. The individual weights of each of the components prescribed in divisions (D)(3)(a), (d), (e), and (f) of this section shall be equal to one-half the weight given to the component prescribed in division (D)(3)(b) of this section. If the joint committee on agency rule review disapproves the department's rules regarding the college, career, workforce, and military readiness component as described in division (D)(3)(f) of this section, division (D)(3)(g)(ii) of this section does not apply. (4)(a) The department shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to establish the performance criteria, benchmarks, and rating system necessary to implement divisions (D) and (F) of this section, including the method for the department to assign performance ratings under division (D)(3) of this section. (b) In establishing the performance criteria, benchmarks, and rating system, the department shall consult with stakeholder groups and advocates that represent parents, community members, students, business leaders, and educators from different school typology regions. The department shall use data from prior school years and simulations to ensure that there is meaningful differentiation among districts and buildings across all performance ratings and that, except as permitted in division (D)(3)(f) of this section, more than half of all districts or buildings do not earn the same performance rating in any component or overall performance rating. (c) The department shall adopt the rules prescribed by division (D)(4) of this section not later than March 31, 2022. However, the department shall notify districts and buildings of the changes to the report card prescribed in law not later than one week after September 30, 2021. (d) Prior to adopting or updating rules under division (D)(4) of this section, the director of education and workforce and the department shall conduct a public presentation before the standing committees of the house of representatives and the senate that consider primary and secondary education legislation describing the format for the report card and the performance criteria, benchmarks, and rating system, including the method to assign performance ratings under division (D)(3) of this section. (E) The department may develop a measure of student academic progress for high school students using only data from assessments in English language arts and mathematics. If the department develops this measure, each school district and applicable school building shall be assigned a separate letter grade for it not sooner than the 2017-2018 school year. The district's or building's grade for that measure shall not be included in determining the district's or building's overall letter grade. (F)(1) The letter grades assigned to a school district or building under this section shall be as follows: (a) "A" for a district or school making excellent progress; (b) "B" for a district or school making above average progress; (c) "C" for a district or school making average progress; (d) "D" for a district or school making below average progress; (e) "F" for a district or school failing to meet minimum progress. (2) For the overall performance rating under division (D)(3) of this section, the department shall include a descriptor for each performance rating as follows: (a) "Significantly exceeds state standards" for a performance rating of five stars; (b) "Exceeds state standards" for a performance rating of four stars or four and one-half stars; (c) "Meets state standards" for a performance rating of three stars or three and one-half stars; (d) "Needs support to meet state standards" for a performance rating of two stars or two and one-half stars; (e) "Needs significant support to meet state standards" for a performance rating of one star or one and one-half stars. (3) For performance ratings for each component under divisions (D)(3)(a) to (f) of this section, the department shall include a description of each component and performance rating. The description shall include component-specific context to each performance rating earned, estimated comparisons to other school districts and buildings if appropriate, and any other information determined by the department. The descriptions shall be not longer than twenty-five words in length when possible. In addition to such descriptions, the department shall include the descriptors in division (F)(2) of this section for component performance ratings. (4) Each report card issued under this section shall include all of the following: (a) A graphic that depicts the performance ratings of a district or school on a color scale. The color associated with a performance rating of three stars shall be green and the color associated with a performance rating of one star shall be red. (b) An arrow graphic that shows data trends for performance ratings for school districts or buildings. The department shall determine the data to be used for this graphic, which shall include at least the three most recent years of data. (c) A description regarding the weights that are assigned to each component and used to determine an overall performance rating, as prescribed under division (D)(3)(g) of this section, which shall be included in the presentation of the overall performance rating on each report card. (G) When reporting data on student achievement and progress, the department shall disaggregate that data according to the following categories: (1) Performance of students by grade-level; (2) Performance of students by race and ethnic group; (3) Performance of students by gender; (4) Performance of students grouped by those who have been enrolled in a district or school for three or more years; (5) Performance of students grouped by those who have been enrolled in a district or school for more than one year and less than three years; (6) Performance of students grouped by those who have been enrolled in a district or school for one year or less; (7) Performance of students grouped by those who are economically disadvantaged; (8) Performance of students grouped by those who are enrolled in a conversion community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; (9) Performance of students grouped by those who are classified as English learners; (10) Performance of students grouped by those who have disabilities; (11) Performance of students grouped by those who are classified as migrants; (12) Performance of students grouped by those who are identified as gifted in superior cognitive ability and the specific academic ability fields of reading and math pursuant to Chapter 3324. of the Revised Code. In disaggregating specific academic ability fields for gifted students, the department shall use data for those students with specific academic ability in math and reading. If any other academic field is assessed, the department shall also include data for students with specific academic ability in that field as well. (13) Performance of students grouped by those who perform in the lowest quintile for achievement on a statewide basis, as determined by a method prescribed by the department. The department may disaggregate data on student performance according to other categories that the department determines are appropriate. To the extent possible, the department shall disaggregate data on student performance according to any combinations of two or more of the categories listed in divisions (G)(1) to (13) of this section that it deems relevant. In reporting data pursuant to division (G) of this section, the department shall not include in the report cards any data statistical in nature that is statistically unreliable or that could result in the identification of individual students. For this purpose, the department shall not report student performance data for any group identified in division (G) of this section that contains less than ten students. If the department does not report student performance data for a group because it contains less than ten students, the department shall indicate on the report card that is why data was not reported. (H) The department may include with the report cards any additional education and fiscal performance data it deems valuable. (I) The department shall include on each report card a list of additional information collected by the department that is available regarding the district or building for which the report card is issued. When available, such additional information shall include student mobility data disaggregated by race and socioeconomic status, college enrollment data, and the reports prepared under section 3302.031 of the Revised Code. The department shall maintain a site on the world wide web. The report card shall include the address of the site and shall specify that such additional information is available to the public at that site. The department shall also provide a copy of each item on the list to the superintendent of each school district. The district superintendent shall provide a copy of any item on the list to anyone who requests it. (J)(1)(a) Except as provided in division (J)(1)(b) of this section, for any district that sponsors a conversion community school under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, the department shall combine data regarding the academic performance of students enrolled in the community school with comparable data from the schools of the district for the purpose of determining the performance of the district as a whole on the report card issued for the district under this section or section 3302.033 of the Revised Code. (b) The department shall not combine data from any conversion community school that a district sponsors if the conversion community school is a dropout prevention and recovery community school, as defined in section 3314.02 of the Revised Code. The department shall include as an addendum to the district's report card the ratings and performance measures that are required under section 3314.017 of the Revised Code for any community school to which division (J)(1)(b) of this section applies. This addendum shall include, at a minimum, the data specified in divisions (C)(1)(a), (C)(2), and (C)(3) of section 3314.017 of the Revised Code. (2) Any district that leases a building to a community school located in the district or that enters into an agreement with a community school located in the district whereby the district and the school endorse each other's programs may elect to have data regarding the academic performance of students enrolled in the community school combined with comparable data from the schools of the district for the purpose of determining the performance of the district as a whole on the district report card. Any district that so elects shall annually file a copy of the lease or agreement with the department. (3) Any municipal school district, as defined in section 3311.71 of the Revised Code, that sponsors a community school located within the district's territory, or that enters into an agreement with a community school located within the district's territory whereby the district and the community school endorse each other's programs, may exercise either or both of the following elections: (a) To have data regarding the academic performance of students enrolled in that community school combined with comparable data from the schools of the district for the purpose of determining the performance of the district as a whole on the district's report card; (b) To have the number of students attending that community school noted separately on the district's report card. The election authorized under division (J)(3)(a) of this section is subject to approval by the governing authority of the community school. Any municipal school district that exercises an election to combine or include data under division (J)(3) of this section, by the first day of October of each year, shall file with the department documentation indicating eligibility for that election, as required by the department. (K) The department shall include on each report card the percentage of teachers in the district or building who are properly certified or licensed teachers, as defined in section 3319.074 of the Revised Code, and a comparison of that percentage with the percentages of such teachers in similar districts and buildings. (L)(1) In calculating English language arts, mathematics, science, American history, or American government assessment passage rates used to determine school district or building performance under this section, the department shall include all students taking an assessment with accommodation or to whom an alternate assessment is administered pursuant to division (C)(1) or (3) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code and all students who take substitute examinations approved under division (B)(4) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code in the subject areas of science, American history and American government. (2) In calculating performance index scores, rates of achievement on the performance indicators established by the department under section 3302.02 of the Revised Code, and annual measurable objectives for determining adequate yearly progress for school districts and buildings under this section, the department shall do all of the following: (a) Include for each district or building only those students who are included in the ADM certified for the first full school week of October and are continuously enrolled in the district or building through the time of the spring administration of any assessment prescribed by division (A)(1) or (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 or division (B) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code that is administered to the student's grade level; (b) Include cumulative totals from both the fall and spring administrations of the third grade English language arts achievement assessment and, to the extent possible, the summer administration of that assessment; (c) Include for each district or building any English learner in accordance with the department's plan, as approved by the United States secretary of education, to comply with the "Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965," 20 U.S.C. 6311 to 6339. As used in this section, "English learner" has the same meaning as in section 3301.0731 of the Revised Code. (M) Beginning with the 2015-2016 school year and at least once every three years thereafter, the department shall review and may adjust the benchmarks for assigning letter grades or performance ratings to the performance measures and components prescribed under divisions (C)(3), (D), and (E) of this section. Sec. 3302.131. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Curriculum list" means the list of curriculum established by the department of education and workforce under section 3313.6035 of the Revised Code. (2) "Third grade mathematics assessment" means the third grade mathematics assessment prescribed under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. (3) "Third grade student" means a student who took the third grade mathematics assessment. (B) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year and each school year thereafter, each school district or community school in which fifty-one per cent or less of the district's or school's third grade students for that school year attained at least a proficient score on the third grade mathematics assessment shall establish and submit to the department of education and workforce a mathematics achievement improvement plan. (C) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year and each school year thereafter, all of the following apply: (1) If thirty-three per cent or less of all of a school district's third grade students attained at least a proficient score on the third grade mathematics assessment in a school year, the district shall use a curriculum from the curriculum list in all of the schools operated by the district in subsequent school years. If not less than fifty-one per cent of the district's third grade students attain at least a proficient score on the third grade mathematics assessment in a subsequent school year, the district may cease using a curriculum from the curriculum list except with respect to a school subject to division (C)(2) of this section. (2) If thirty-three per cent or less of third grade students in a school operated by a school district attained at least a proficient score on the third grade mathematics assessment in a school year, that school shall use a curriculum from the curriculum list in subsequent school years. If not less than fifty-one per cent of the school's third grade students attain at least a proficient score on the third grade mathematics assessment in a subsequent school year, the school may cease using curriculum unless the school's district is subject to division (C)(1) of this section. (3) If thirty-three per cent or less of a community school's third grade students attained at least a proficient score on the third grade mathematics assessment, the school shall use a curriculum from the curriculum list in subsequent school years. If not less than fifty-one per cent of the school's third grade students attain at least a proficient score on the third grade mathematics assessment in a subsequent school year, the school may cease using a curriculum from the curriculum list. (D) The department shall establish guidelines prescribing the content of and deadlines for mathematics achievement improvement plans required under division (A) of this section. The guidelines shall prescribe that each plan include, at a minimum, an analysis of relevant student performance data, measurable student performance goals, strategies to meet specific student needs, a staffing and professional development plan, and instructional strategies for improving student performance. The department also shall establish guidelines regarding the implementation of the mathematics achievement improvement plans. (E) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year and each school year thereafter, any school district or community school to which this section applies is no longer required to submit an improvement plan pursuant to division (A) of this section when not less than fifty-one per cent of the district's students who took the third grade mathematics assessment prescribed under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code for that school year attained at least a proficient score on that assessment. (F) The department shall post in a prominent location on its web site all plans submitted and all guidelines developed pursuant to this section. (G) The department shall develop a student academic intervention template specific to mathematics and post it on its publicly accessible web site. Each district or school to which this section applies shall include the intervention template in its mathematics achievement improvement plan. Sec. 3302.132. (A) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year and each school year thereafter, a school district shall develop a mathematics improvement and monitoring plan for each student for which it is required to provide mathematics intervention services under section 3313.6034 of the Revised Code. The district shall develop the plan within sixty days after receiving the student's results on the mathematics achievement assessment, end-of-course examination, or diagnostic assessment that qualifies the student for mathematics intervention services under that section. The district shall involve the student's parent or guardian and classroom teacher in developing the plan. The plan shall include all of the following: (1) Identification of the student's specific mathematics deficiencies; (2) A description of the additional instructional services and support that will be provided to the student to remediate the identified mathematics deficiencies; (3) Opportunities for the student's parent or guardian to be involved in the instructional services and support described in division (A)(2) of this section; (4) A process for monitoring the extent to which the student receives the instructional services and support described in division (A)(2) of this section; (5) A mathematics curriculum during regular school hours that does all of the following: (a) Assists students in mathematics at grade level; (b) Provides scientifically based and reliable assessment; (c) Provides initial and ongoing analysis of each student's progress. (6) High-dosage tutoring opportunities aligned with the student's classroom instruction through a state-approved vendor on the list of high-quality tutoring vendors under section 3301.136 of the Revised Code or a locally approved opportunity that aligns with high-dosage tutoring best practices. High-dosage tutoring opportunities shall include instruction time delivered at least three days per week, or at least fifty hours over thirty-six weeks. High-dosage tutoring may be incorporated into a student's regular classroom instruction. (B)(1) The district shall continue to implement the plan developed under division (A) of this section as follows: (a) If the student is in the sixth grade or lower when the student is placed on the plan, the plan shall be implemented until the student completes the sixth grade. (b) If the student has completed the sixth grade prior to being placed on the plan, the plan shall be implemented until the student achieves the required level of skill in mathematics for the student's current grade level. (2) The district shall report any information requested by the department of education and workforce about the mathematics improvement and monitoring plans developed under this section in the manner required by the department. Sec. 3313.6032. (A) Beginning July 1, 2026, each school district shall do all of the following: (1) Enroll each seventh-grade student who achieves an accomplished or advanced level of skill on a mathematics achievement assessment prescribed under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code in Algebra I in eighth grade, unless the student has already completed Algebra I. Each student shall take the corresponding required end-of-course examination for Algebra I as prescribed under division (D) of this section. (2) Enroll each student in grades three through six who achieves an accomplished or advanced level of skill on a mathematics achievement assessment prescribed under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code in advanced learning opportunities in mathematics. Advanced learning opportunities in mathematics means a course that exceeds the standard mathematics curriculum for the student's grade level, or services or curricula modifications in mathematics, provided either in person or through electronic means, which provide additional rigor or challenge, and may include the following: (a) Differentiated instruction in which the depth, breadth, complexity, pacing, and acceleration is tailored to the student's particular needs and readiness; (b) Interdisciplinary work. (3) Adopt a comprehensive mathematics placement policy that includes a curriculum plan beginning in grade three that does both of the following: (a) Creates a timeline and explanation of how students will be prepared and placed in Algebra I; (b) Describes how the school district will provide advanced learning opportunities in mathematics and accommodate each student in grade seven that qualifies for placement in Algebra I under division (A)(1) of this section. (B) Each school district shall notify the parent or guardian of a student who qualifies for enrollment in Algebra I under division (A)(1) of this section of that determination. The parent or guardian of any such student may submit a written request for that student to not be enrolled in Algebra I, in which case the district is not required to enroll the student in Algebra I. (C) The department of education and workforce shall provide school districts with guidance regarding the placement of students in Algebra I under division (A)(1) of this section, based on the student's performance in the previous school year on a mathematics achievement assessment prescribed under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. (D) Each student shall take any corresponding required achievement assessment or end-of-course examination for any mathematics course the student takes as a result of enrollment in an advanced mathematics course under this section. (E) Each school district may provide additional students advanced learning opportunities in mathematics, including enrollment in advanced courses such as Algebra I, if a student meets district requirements for such a course or would benefit from those opportunities. Sec. 3313.6034. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Qualifying student" means a student who demonstrates a limited level of skill on an achievement assessment prescribed under section 3301.0710 or an end-of-course examination prescribed under section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code in mathematics or English language arts, or both, or who demonstrates a level of skill that is below grade level or below proficient on a mathematics diagnostic assessment. "Qualifying student" does not include a student that has an individualized education program developed under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code that includes services related to a traumatic brain injury or a student that attends a dropout prevention and recovery community school, as defined in section 3314.02 of the Revised Code. (2) "Tutoring supports" means high-dosage tutoring opportunities aligned with the student's classroom instruction through a state-approved vendor on the list of high-quality tutoring vendors under section 3301.136 of the Revised Code or a locally approved opportunity that aligns with high-dosage tutoring best practices. High-dosage tutoring opportunities shall include instruction time delivered at least three days per week, or at least fifty hours over thirty-six weeks. High-dosage tutoring may be incorporated into a student's regular classroom instruction. To the extent practicable, districts and schools shall endeavor to provide each of a student's tutoring supports with the same tutor. (3) "Integrated student supports" means an evidence-based approach whereby schools intentionally and systematically leverage and coordinate resources and relationships available in the school and the surrounding community to address comprehensive student strengths, interests, and needs. (B) Each school district, community school established pursuant to Chapter 3314., and STEM school established pursuant to Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code shall provide evidence-based academic intervention services, free of cost, to each qualifying student. The district or school shall provide those services directly, through a contracted vendor, or as a combination of both options. A district or school annually shall notify the department of education and workforce, through the education management information system established under section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code, of all of the following: (1) The number of qualifying students enrolled in the district or school; (2) The number of qualifying students receiving academic intervention services in mathematics, English language arts, or both; (3) The number of qualifying students receiving academic intervention services from the district or school directly, through a vendor, or a combination of both options. (C)(1) Academic intervention services provided to a student under this section may encompass a variety of evidence-based supports, including tutoring supports, additional instruction time, an extended school calendar, participation in a learning support program, or any other academically centered support service that the district or school determines will improve the student's academic performance. Intervention services may also be offered in combination with integrated student supports. (2) All academic intervention services provided to a qualifying student under this section shall align with the academic instruction the student receives. Intervention services shall be in addition to and not a replacement for existing academic instruction and other services provided to students. All academic intervention services in English language arts shall align with the science of reading as defined in section 3313.6028 of the Revised Code. (D) A district or school shall ensure that academic intervention services provided to a qualifying student under division (C) of this section do not supplant the student's core academic instructional time. (E)(1) A district or school shall notify the parent or guardian of a qualifying student that the student will receive academic intervention services prior to providing services to the student. Notification shall include a description of which intervention or interventions the qualifying student will receive and who will provide services to the student. (2) The district or school periodically shall update the parent or guardian on the academic intervention services provided to the qualifying student and shall provide resources and recommendations for ways the parent or guardian may assist the qualifying student. (F)(1) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, and each school year thereafter, the department randomly shall identify and select individual schools operated by a school district, community schools, and STEM schools for a review of their academic intervention services for qualifying students under this section. The department shall not select more than five per cent of all schools to review each year. No school shall be selected for review more than once every three years. The review shall include, at a minimum, a document review, interviews with applicable school staff, and observations of interventions. The review shall assess all of the following: (a) Whether qualifying students receive academic intervention services in accordance with division (B) of this section; (b) The types and methods of academic intervention services that qualifying students receive; (c) The quality of the academic intervention services provided by the school or the contracted vendor. To determine quality, the department may consider the length and duration of the intervention, specific programs and curriculum being used, the credentials and training of intervention providers, and data regarding qualifying student progress. (2) The department shall provide a report to the school containing its review of the school's academic intervention services not later than seventy-five days after the department completes the review. Each report shall include an assessment of the efficacy of the academic intervention services provided to qualifying students, along with any recommendations the department considers necessary. The school shall post a copy of the report on its web site and shall make the report available upon request to any person. The department shall include a review completed under this division as part of the student opportunity profile on the state report card under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (3) The department may contract with an organization that has documented expertise in supporting school improvement and academic intervention services to help with conducting its review under division (F) of this section. (G)(1) A student is no longer a qualifying student under this section when the student achieves a level of skill higher than limited on a statewide assessment or diagnostic assessment prescribed under sections 3301.079, 3301.0710, 3301.0712, and 3301.0715 of the Revised Code, in mathematics or English language arts, taken for the grade level in which the student is enrolled. (2) If a qualifying student receiving academic intervention services in both mathematics and English language arts demonstrates a skill greater than limited under this section in one, but not both, subject areas, the student shall continue to receive academic intervention services for the subject area in which the student continues to demonstrate a limited level of skill. (3) Any student in any of grades nine through twelve who fails to demonstrate a level of skill greater than limited on an end-of-course examination in mathematics or English language arts, or both, as prescribed under section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code, and is not required to retake the examination, continues to qualify for intervention services under this section. For such a student, the district or school shall align intervention services with the student's selected graduation pathway prescribed under section 3313.618 of the Revised Code. (H) Nothing in this section prohibits a district or school from providing academic intervention services to a student who does not meet the definition of a qualifying student under this section. Sec. 3313.6035. Not later than April 15, 2026, the department of education and workforce shall review core math curricula and establish a list of high-quality core curriculum and instructional materials in mathematics, and a list of evidence-based math intervention programs, that are aligned with state standards and best practices. Each school district, community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, and STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code may use the core curriculum and instructional materials established by the department or may select different high-quality core curriculum and instructional materials. Sec. 3314.03. A copy of every contract entered into under this section shall be filed with the director of education and workforce. The department of education and workforce shall make available on its web site a copy of every approved, executed contract filed with the director under this section. (A) Each contract entered into between a sponsor and the governing authority of a community school shall specify the following: (1) That the school shall be established as either of the following: (a) A nonprofit corporation established under Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code, if established prior to April 8, 2003; (b) A public benefit corporation established under Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code, if established after April 8, 2003. (2) The education program of the school, including the school's mission and educational philosophy, the characteristics of the students the school is expected to attract, the ages and grades of students, and the focus of the curriculum; (3) The academic goals to be achieved and the method of measurement that will be used to determine progress toward those goals, which shall include the statewide achievement assessments; (4) Performance standards, including but not limited to all applicable report card measures set forth in section 3302.03 or 3314.017 of the Revised Code, by which the success of the school will be evaluated by the sponsor; (5) The admission standards of section 3314.06 of the Revised Code and, if applicable, section 3314.061 of the Revised Code; (6)(a) Dismissal procedures; (b) A requirement that the governing authority adopt an attendance policy that includes a procedure for automatically withdrawing a student from the school if the student without a legitimate excuse fails to participate in seventy-two consecutive hours of the learning opportunities offered to the student. (7) The ways by which the school will achieve racial and ethnic balance reflective of the community it serves; (8) Requirements for financial audits by the auditor of state. The contract shall require financial records of the school to be maintained in the same manner as are financial records of school districts, pursuant to rules of the auditor of state. Audits shall be conducted in accordance with section 117.10 of the Revised Code. (9) An addendum to the contract outlining the facilities to be used that contains at least the following information: (a) A detailed description of each facility used for instructional purposes; (b) The annual costs associated with leasing each facility that are paid by or on behalf of the school; (c) The annual mortgage principal and interest payments that are paid by the school; (d) The name of the lender or landlord, identified as such, and the lender's or landlord's relationship to the operator, if any. (10) Qualifications of employees, including both of the following: (a) A requirement that the school's classroom teachers be licensed in accordance with sections 3319.22 to 3319.31 of the Revised Code, except that a community school may engage noncertificated persons to teach up to twelve hours or forty hours per week pursuant to section 3319.301 of the Revised Code; (b) A prohibition against the school employing an individual described in section 3314.104 of the Revised Code in any position. (11) That the school will comply with the following requirements: (a) The school will provide learning opportunities to a minimum of twenty-five students for a minimum of nine hundred twenty hours per school year. (b) The governing authority will purchase liability insurance, or otherwise provide for the potential liability of the school. (c) The school will be nonsectarian in its programs, admission policies, employment practices, and all other operations, and will not be operated by a sectarian school or religious institution. (d) The school will comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 109.65, 121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 3301.0710, 3301.0711, 3301.0712, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.24, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3302.131, 3302.132, 3313.472, 3313.473, 3313.474, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.609, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 3313.6024, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.6031, 3313.6032, 3313.6034, 3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.814, 3313.816, 3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.8110, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.2214, 3319.238, 3319.318, 3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 3319.46, 3319.90, 3319.614, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and Chapters 117., 1347., 2744., 3365., 3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 4167. of the Revised Code as if it were a school district and will comply with section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code in the manner specified in section 3314.17 of the Revised Code. (e) The school shall comply with Chapter 102. and section 2921.42 of the Revised Code. (f) The school will comply with sections 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.617, 3313.618, and 3313.6114 of the Revised Code, except that for students who enter ninth grade for the first time before July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 3313.61 and 3313.611 of the Revised Code that a person must successfully complete the curriculum in any high school prior to receiving a high school diploma may be met by completing the curriculum adopted by the governing authority of the community school rather than the curriculum specified in Title XXXIII of the Revised Code or any rules of the department. Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 3313.61 and 3313.611 of the Revised Code that a person must successfully complete the curriculum of a high school prior to receiving a high school diploma shall be met by completing the requirements prescribed in section 3313.6027 and division (C) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code, unless the person qualifies under division (D) or (F) of that section. Each school shall comply with the plan for awarding high school credit based on demonstration of subject area competency, and beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, with the updated plan that permits students enrolled in seventh and eighth grade to meet curriculum requirements based on subject area competency adopted by the department under divisions (J)(1) and (2) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. Beginning with the 2018-2019 school year, the school shall comply with the framework for granting units of high school credit to students who demonstrate subject area competency through work-based learning experiences, internships, or cooperative education developed by the department under division (J)(3) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. (g) The school governing authority will submit within four months after the end of each school year a report of its activities and progress in meeting the goals and standards of divisions (A)(3) and (4) of this section and its financial status to the sponsor and the parents of all students enrolled in the school. (h) The school, unless it is an internet- or computer-based community school, will comply with section 3313.801 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. (i) If the school is the recipient of moneys from a grant awarded under the federal race to the top program, Division (A), Title XIV, Sections 14005 and 14006 of the "American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009," Pub. L. No. 111-5, 123 Stat. 115, the school will pay teachers based upon performance in accordance with section 3317.141 and will comply with section 3319.111 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. (j) If the school operates a preschool program that is licensed by the department under sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code, the school shall comply with sections 3301.50 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code and the minimum standards for preschool programs prescribed in rules adopted by the department of children and youth under section 3301.53 of the Revised Code. (k) The school will comply with sections 3313.6021 and 3313.6023 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district unless it is either of the following: (i) An internet- or computer-based community school; (ii) A community school in which a majority of the enrolled students are children with disabilities as described in division (B)(2) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code. (l) The school will comply with section 3321.191 of the Revised Code, unless it is an internet- or computer-based community school that is subject to section 3314.261 of the Revised Code. (m) The school will comply with section 3313.7118 of the Revised Code if it serves elementary school students. (12) Arrangements for providing health and other benefits to employees; (13) The length of the contract, which shall begin at the beginning of an academic year. No contract shall exceed five years unless such contract has been renewed pursuant to division (D) of this section. (14) The governing authority of the school, which shall be responsible for carrying out the provisions of the contract; (15) A financial plan detailing an estimated school budget for each year of the period of the contract and specifying the total estimated per pupil expenditure amount for each such year. (16) Requirements and procedures regarding the disposition of employees of the school in the event the contract is terminated or not renewed pursuant to section 3314.07 of the Revised Code; (17) Whether the school is to be created by converting all or part of an existing public school or educational service center building or is to be a new start-up school, and if it is a converted public school or service center building, both of the following: (a) Specification of any duties or responsibilities of an employer that the board of education or service center governing board that operated the school or building before conversion is delegating to the governing authority of the community school with respect to all or any specified group of employees provided the delegation is not prohibited by a collective bargaining agreement applicable to such employees; (b) Alternative arrangements for current public school students who choose not to attend the converted school and for teachers who choose not to teach in the school or building after conversion. (18) Provisions establishing procedures for resolving disputes or differences of opinion between the sponsor and the governing authority of the community school; (19) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt a policy regarding the admission of students who reside outside the district in which the school is located. That policy shall comply with the admissions procedures specified in sections 3314.06 and 3314.061 of the Revised Code and, at the sole discretion of the authority, shall do one of the following: (a) Prohibit the enrollment of students who reside outside the district in which the school is located; (b) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in districts adjacent to the district in which the school is located; (c) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in any other district in the state. (20) A provision recognizing the authority of the department to take over the sponsorship of the school in accordance with the provisions of division (C) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code; (21) A provision recognizing the sponsor's authority to assume the operation of a school under the conditions specified in division (B) of section 3314.073 of the Revised Code; (22) A provision recognizing both of the following: (a) The authority of public health and safety officials to inspect the facilities of the school and to order the facilities closed if those officials find that the facilities are not in compliance with health and safety laws and regulations; (b) The authority of the department as the community school oversight body to suspend the operation of the school under section 3314.072 of the Revised Code if the department has evidence of conditions or violations of law at the school that pose an imminent danger to the health and safety of the school's students and employees and the sponsor refuses to take such action. (23) A description of the learning opportunities that will be offered to students including both classroom-based and non-classroom-based learning opportunities that is in compliance with criteria for student participation established by the department under division (H)(2) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code; (24) The school will comply with sections 3302.04 and 3302.041 of the Revised Code, except that any action required to be taken by a school district pursuant to those sections shall be taken by the sponsor of the school. (25) Beginning in the 2006-2007 school year, the school will open for operation not later than the thirtieth day of September each school year, unless the mission of the school as specified under division (A)(2) of this section is solely to serve dropouts. In its initial year of operation, if the school fails to open by the thirtieth day of September, or within one year after the adoption of the contract pursuant to division (D) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code if the mission of the school is solely to serve dropouts, the contract shall be void. (26) Whether the school's governing authority is planning to seek designation for the school as a STEM school equivalent under section 3326.032 of the Revised Code; (27) That the school's attendance and participation policies will be available for public inspection; (28) That the school's attendance and participation records shall be made available to the department, auditor of state, and school's sponsor to the extent permitted under and in accordance with the "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974," 88 Stat. 571, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, as amended, and any regulations promulgated under that act, and section 3319.321 of the Revised Code; (29) If a school operates using the blended learning model, as defined in section 3301.079 of the Revised Code, all of the following information: (a) An indication of what blended learning model or models will be used; (b) A description of how student instructional needs will be determined and documented; (c) The method to be used for determining competency, granting credit, and promoting students to a higher grade level; (d) The school's attendance requirements, including how the school will document participation in learning opportunities; (e) A statement describing how student progress will be monitored; (f) A statement describing how private student data will be protected; (g) A description of the professional development activities that will be offered to teachers. (30) A provision requiring that all moneys the school's operator loans to the school, including facilities loans or cash flow assistance, must be accounted for, documented, and bear interest at a fair market rate; (31) A provision requiring that, if the governing authority contracts with an attorney, accountant, or entity specializing in audits, the attorney, accountant, or entity shall be independent from the operator with which the school has contracted. (32) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt an enrollment and attendance policy that requires a student's parent to notify the community school in which the student is enrolled when there is a change in the location of the parent's or student's primary residence. (33) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt a student residence and address verification policy for students enrolling in or attending the school. (34) A provision establishing the process by which the governing authority of the school will be selected in the future. (35) A description of the management and administration of the school. (36) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt policies and procedures to establish internal financial controls for the school. (B) A contract entered into under section 3314.02 of the Revised Code between a sponsor and the governing authority of a community school may provide for the community school governing authority to make payments to the sponsor, which is hereby authorized to receive such payments as set forth in the contract between the governing authority and the sponsor. The total amount of such payments for monitoring, oversight, and technical assistance of the school shall not exceed three per cent of the total amount of payments for operating expenses that the school receives from the state. (C) The contract shall specify the duties of the sponsor which shall be in accordance with the written agreement entered into with the department under division (B) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code and shall include the following: (1) Monitor the community school's compliance with all laws applicable to the school and with the terms of the contract; (2) Monitor and evaluate the academic and fiscal performance and the organization and operation of the community school on at least an annual basis; (3) Provide technical assistance to the community school in complying with laws applicable to the school and terms of the contract; (4) Take steps to intervene in the school's operation to correct problems in the school's overall performance, declare the school to be on probationary status pursuant to section 3314.073 of the Revised Code, suspend the operation of the school pursuant to section 3314.072 of the Revised Code, or terminate the contract of the school pursuant to section 3314.07 of the Revised Code as determined necessary by the sponsor; (5) Have in place a plan of action to be undertaken in the event the community school experiences financial difficulties or closes prior to the end of a school year. (D) Upon the expiration of a contract entered into under this section, the sponsor of a community school may, with the approval of the governing authority of the school, renew that contract for a period of time determined by the sponsor, but not ending earlier than the end of any school year, if the sponsor finds that the school's compliance with applicable laws and terms of the contract and the school's progress in meeting the academic goals prescribed in the contract have been satisfactory. Any contract that is renewed under this division remains subject to the provisions of sections 3314.07, 3314.072, and 3314.073 of the Revised Code. (E) If a community school fails to open for operation within one year after the contract entered into under this section is adopted pursuant to division (D) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code or permanently closes prior to the expiration of the contract, the contract shall be void and the school shall not enter into a contract with any other sponsor. A school shall not be considered permanently closed because the operations of the school have been suspended pursuant to section 3314.072 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3317.25. (A) As used in this section, "disadvantaged pupil impact aid" means the following: (1) For a city, local, or exempted village school district, the funds received under division (A)(4)(a) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code; (2) For a joint vocational school district, the funds received under division (A)(3) of section 3317.16 of the Revised Code; (3) For a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, the funds received under division (A)(4)(b) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code; (4) For a STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, the funds received under division (A)(4)(b) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, community school, or STEM school shall spend the disadvantaged pupil impact aid it receives for any of the following initiatives or a combination of any of the following initiatives: (a) Extended school day and school year; (b) Reading improvement and intervention that is aligned with the science of reading and evidence-based strategies for effective literacy instruction; (c) Instructional technology or blended learning; (d) Professional development in the science of reading and evidence-based strategies for effective literacy instruction for teachers of students in kindergarten through third grade; (e) Dropout prevention; (f) School safety and security measures; (g) Community learning centers that address barriers to learning; (h) Academic interventions for students in any of grades six through twelve; (i) Employment of an individual who has successfully completed the bright new leaders for Ohio schools program as a principal or an assistant principal under section 3319.272 of the Revised Code; (j) Mental health services, including telehealth services, community-based behavioral health services, and recovery supports; (k) Culturally appropriate, evidence-based or evidence-informed prevention services, including youth-led programming and curricula to promote mental health and prevent substance use and suicide, and trauma-informed services; (l) Services for homeless youth; (m) Services for child welfare involved youth; (n) Community liaisons or programs that connect students to community resources, including behavioral wellness coordinators and city connects, communities in schools, and other similar programs; (o) Physical health care services, including telehealth services and community-based health services; (p) Family engagement and support services; (q) Student services provided prior to or after the regularly scheduled school day or any time school is not in session, including mentoring programs; (r) Professional development on evidence-based strategies for effective mathematics instruction; (s) Implementation of high-quality core curriculum in math identified by the department of education and workforce under section 3313.6035 of the Revised Code. (2) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, each city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school district, community school, and STEM school shall spend the disadvantaged pupil impact aid it receives for one or more initiatives specified by the general assembly. (C)(1) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, each city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school district, community school, and STEM school that is subject to the requirements of this section shall develop a plan for utilizing the disadvantaged pupil impact aid it receives in coordination with at least one of the following community partners: (a) A board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services established under Chapter 340. of the Revised Code; (b) An educational service center; (c) A county board of developmental disabilities; (d) A community mental health prevention or treatment provider; (e) A board of health of a city or general health district; (f) A county department of job and family services; (g) A nonprofit organization with experience serving children; (h) A public hospital agency. (2) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, each city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school district, community school, and STEM school that is subject to the requirements of this section shall develop a plan for utilizing the disadvantaged pupil impact aid it receives in the manner specified by the general assembly, if the general assembly requires city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school districts, community schools, and STEM schools to develop such a plan. (D) After the end of each fiscal year, each city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, community school, and STEM school shall submit a report to the department of education and workforce describing the initiative or initiatives on which the district's or school's disadvantaged pupil impact aid were spent during that fiscal year. For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, this report shall be submitted in a manner prescribed by the department and shall also describe the amount of money that was spent on each initiative. (E) Starting in 2015, the department shall submit a report of the information it receives under division (C) of this section to the general assembly not later than the first day of December of each odd-numbered year in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3319.2214. This section applies to each individual who applies for a new valid educator license under section 3319.22 of the Revised Code with a grade band specification of grades pre-kindergarten through eight and who may be assigned to teach mathematics. The state board of education shall assess whether each individual to whom this section applies is proficient in mathematics at the time that individual applies for a license. The chancellor of higher education, in consultation with the department of education and workforce, shall define the level of proficiency at which individuals are prepared to provide high-quality math instruction. The chancellor and the department shall collaborate with the state board to set appropriate benchmarks. Whether that individual is proficient in mathematics does not affect the state board's duty to issue that applicant a license. However, the state board shall certify to each school district or other school that employs that individual whether the individual is proficient in mathematics based on the state board's assessment. If the individual has not demonstrated proficiency in mathematics, the district or school shall not assign that individual to teach mathematics. Nevertheless, the district or school may permit that individual to teach in other subject areas. An individual who has not demonstrated proficiency in mathematics according to the state board's assessment may retake the assessment. If the individual demonstrates proficiency in mathematics in the subsequent assessment, the state board shall certify to each school district or other school that employs the individual that the individual is proficient in mathematics. In that case, the district or school may assign the individual to teach mathematics. The state board shall adopt rules to implement this section. Sec. 3319.2311. The department of education and workforce shall do both of the following: (A) Develop a professional development course that focuses on foundational knowledge in mathematics and integrates life skills; (B) Not later than December 31, 2026, develop a pilot series of professional development programs for school and regional educational leaders on evidence-based mathematics instruction. Sec. 3324.10. (A) The department of education and workforce shall adopt a model student acceleration policy addressing recommendations in the former department of education's 2005 study conducted under the gifted research and demonstration grant program. The policy shall address, but not be limited to, whole grade acceleration, subject area acceleration, and early high school graduation. The policy also shall include providing advanced learning opportunities in mathematics under section 3313.6032 of the Revised Code. (B) The board of education of each city, local, and exempted village school district shall implement a student acceleration policy to take effect beginning in the 2006-2007 school year. The policy shall either be the model adopted by the department under division (A) of this section or a policy covering similar issues that is adopted by the district board. If the district board does not adopt the department's model, it shall submit its policy to the department for review and approval. The department, upon request, shall provide technical assistance to the district board in developing the policy. Sec. 3326.11. Each science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under this chapter and its governing body shall comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 109.65, 121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 2921.42, 2921.43, 3301.0714, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.24, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3302.131, 3302.132, 3313.14, 3313.15, 3313.16, 3313.18, 3313.201, 3313.26, 3313.472, 3313.473, 3313.474, 3313.48, 3313.481, 3313.482, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 3313.6021, 3313.6023, 3313.6024, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.6031, 3313.6032, 3313.6034, 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.615, 3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 3313.717, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.7118, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.801, 3313.814, 3313.816, 3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.8110, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.21, 3319.2214, 3319.238, 3319.318, 3319.32, 3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.35, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 3319.45, 3319.46, 3319.614, 3319.90, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.05, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 3321.191, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and Chapters 102., 117., 1347., 2744., 3307., 3309., 3365., 3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 4167. of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. Section 2. That existing sections 3301.0714, 3302.03, 3314.03, 3317.25, 3324.10, and 3326.11 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. That section 3313.6032 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed. Section 4. This act shall be known as the Science of Math Act. Section 5. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections as presented in this act: Section 3314.03 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 10 and H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly. Section 3326.11 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 10 and H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly.